New Jersey, session 221, A5185.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.2021, c.421 (C.18A:64A-86) is amended to read as follows: 5.  a.  There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education the sum of $1,000,000 for the purposes of fulfilling the provisions of this act. Beginning in Fiscal Year 2026, there is annually appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education such amounts as are necessary to fulfill the provisions of P.L.2021, c.421 (C.18A:64A-82 et seq.). b.    The Office of the Secretary of Higher Education shall distribute a grant to the New Jersey Community College Consortium for Workforce and Economic Development to establish the Direct Support Professional Career Development Program at a Center for Workforce Innovation, and at the program's additional sites, and annually distribute fellowship funding to cover living expenses for participating individuals[, and establish a fund for] and to support existing direct support professionals to cover costs associated with furthering their education. No more than 10 percent of the funds appropriated pursuant to this section shall be used for administrative expenses. The Secretary of Higher Education shall approve any budget pursuant to this act. (cf: P.L.2021, c.421, s.5) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.